Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1913
Department; provide access to information; manner; objections.

(1) The department shall provide the Director of Legislative Oversight and the office with access to records, reports, and documents maintained by the department in connection with administration of the Nebraska correctional system and the Nebraska parole system. The Director of Legislative Oversight's and Inspector General's access to an inmate's or parolee's medical or mental health records shall be subject to the inmate's or parolee's consent unless an inmate's or parolee's death is being investigated pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section 50-1906.

(2) Information shall be provided in the most efficient and timely way, in a manner that is least burdensome to the department, and in a manner which maintains the confidentiality of the information. This may include providing information through secure electronic access to case files and secure access to information maintained electronically in databases and case management systems. The office, by and through the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, may enter into information-sharing agreements with the department to assist in the implementation of and compliance with the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.

(3)(a) The department may object to the production or disclosure of records, reports, and documents in writing on the grounds that such records, reports, and documents are legally privileged, identifying the specific grounds for such objection. Following such objection, the office and the department may negotiate terms of production or disclosure pursuant to this section.

(b) In the event that satisfactory terms of production or disclosure cannot be reached between the office and the department, the office may request the issuance of a subpoena pursuant to section 50-1910.

Laws 2015, LB598, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 47-913;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 57.